Illinois, session 104th, HB79.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 7-144 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/7-144)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-144)7    Sec. 7-144. Retirement annuities; suspended during 8employment. 9    (a) If any person receiving any annuity again becomes an 10employee and receives earnings from employment in a position 11requiring him, or entitling him to elect, to become a 12participating employee, then the annuity payable to such 13employee shall be suspended as of the first day of the month 14coincidental with or next following the date upon which such 15person becomes such an employee, unless the person is 16authorized under subsection (b) of Section 7-137.1 of this 17Code to continue receiving a retirement annuity during that 18period. Upon proper qualification of the participating 19employee payment of such annuity may be resumed on the first 20day of the month following such qualification and upon proper 21application therefor. The participating employee in such case 22shall be entitled to a supplemental annuity arising from 23service and credits earned subsequent to such re-entry as a   HB0079 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03202 RPS 13223 b1participating employee.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, an 3annuitant shall be considered a participating employee if he 4or she returns to work as an employee with a participating 5employer and works more than 599 hours annually (or 999 hours 6annually with a participating employer that has adopted a 7resolution pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 7-137 of this 8Code). Each of these annual periods shall commence on the 9month and day upon which the annuitant is first employed with 10the participating employer following the effective date of the 11annuity. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, an 13annuitant receiving an annuity under Section 7-142.1 shall be 14considered a participating employee if the annuitant returns 15to work as a school security guard employed by a participating 16employer and works more than 999 hours annually. 17    (a-5) If any annuitant under this Article must be 18considered a participating employee per the provisions of 19subsection (a) of this Section, and the participating 20municipality or participating instrumentality that employs or 21re-employs that annuitant knowingly fails to notify the Board 22to suspend the annuity, the participating municipality or 23participating instrumentality may be required to reimburse the 24Fund for an amount up to one-half of the total of any annuity 25payments made to the annuitant after the date the annuity 26should have been suspended, as determined by the Board. In no   HB0079 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03202 RPS 13223 b1case shall the total amount repaid by the annuitant plus any 2amount reimbursed by the employer to the Fund be more than the 3total of all annuity payments made to the annuitant after the 4date the annuity should have been suspended. This subsection 5shall not apply if the annuitant returned to work for the 6employer for less than 12 months.7    The Fund shall notify all annuitants that they must notify 8the Fund immediately if they return to work for any 9participating employer. The notification by the Fund shall 10occur upon retirement and no less than annually thereafter in 11a format determined by the Fund. The Fund shall also develop 12and maintain a system to track annuitants who have returned to 13work and notify the participating employer and annuitant at 14least annually of the limitations on returning to work under 15this Section.16    (b) Supplemental annuities to persons who return to 17service for less than 48 months shall be computed under the 18provisions of Sections 7-141, 7-142, and 7-143. In determining 19whether an employee is eligible for an annuity which requires 20a minimum period of service, his entire period of service 21shall be taken into consideration but the supplemental annuity 22shall be based on earnings and service in the supplemental 23period only. The effective date of the suspended and 24supplemental annuity for the purpose of increases after 25retirement shall be considered to be the effective date of the 26suspended annuity.  HB0079 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03202 RPS 13223 b1    (c) Supplemental annuities to persons who return to 2service for 48 months or more shall be a monthly amount 3determined as follows:4        (1) An amount shall be computed under subparagraph b 5    of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 7-142, 6    considering all of the service credits of the employee.7        (2) The actuarial value in monthly payments for life 8    of the annuity payments made before suspension shall be 9    determined and subtracted from the amount determined in 10    paragraph (1) above.11        (3) The monthly amount of the suspended annuity, with 12    any applicable increases after retirement computed from 13    the effective date to the date of reinstatement, shall be 14    subtracted from the amount determined in paragraph (2) 15    above and the remainder shall be the amount of the 16    supplemental annuity provided that this amount shall not 17    be less than the amount computed under subsection (b) of 18    this Section.19        (4) The suspended annuity shall be reinstated at an 20    amount including any increases after retirement from the 21    effective date to date of reinstatement.22        (5) The effective date of the combined suspended and 23    supplemental annuities for the purposes of increases after 24    retirement shall be considered to be the effective date of 25    the supplemental annuity.26    (d) If a Tier 2 regular employee becomes a member or   HB0079 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03202 RPS 13223 b1participant under any other system or fund created by this 2Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for those 3members or participants exempted from the provisions of 4subsection (a) of Section 1-160 of this Code (other than a 5participating employee under this Article), then the person's 6retirement annuity shall be suspended during that employment. 7Upon termination of that employment, the person's retirement 8annuity shall resume and be recalculated as required by this 9Section. 10    (e) If a Tier 2 regular employee first began participation 11on or after January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement 12annuity and accepts on a contractual basis a position to 13provide services to a governmental entity from which he or she 14has retired, then that person's annuity or retirement pension 15shall be suspended during that contractual service, 16notwithstanding the provisions of any other Section in this 17Article. Such annuitant shall notify the Fund, as well as his 18or her contractual employer, of his or her retirement status 19before accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to 20submit such notification shall be guilty of a Class A 21misdemeanor and required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon 22termination of that contractual employment, the person's 23retirement annuity shall resume and be recalculated as 24required by this Section. 25(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB0079 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 03202 RPS 13223 b1becoming law.